Wyoming, session 2026, HB0080.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-8-103(d) and by creating a new
subsection (e) is amended to read:
31-8-103. Expiration; records; new cards; renewal by
persons living in care facilities.
(d) The division shall send a notification for an
identification card to the last known address of every
eligible registrant, or notify by electronic means if the
eligible registrant has consented to receive notices
electronically, within one hundred twenty (120) days prior
to expiration of the registrant's identification card. The
notification shall conspicuously advise registrants of the
requirement that in person voters present acceptable
identification immediately before voting at the polling
place or absentee polling place and that an identification
card is a form of acceptable identification. The notice
shall also state that persons living in nursing care
facilities and assisted living facilities may renew the
identification card by mail in accordance with subsection
(e) of this section. Every identification card is renewable
upon application and payment of the required fee. As used
in this section, "last known address" means the address,
email address or other electronic contact information, as
applicable according to the sending method, on file with
the division.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0080
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(e) A person who is a resident of a nursing home or
assisted living facility may renew an identification card
issued under this article without appearing in person,
subject to all of the following:
(i) The person renewing the identification card:
(A) Is a full-time resident of a nursing
care facility as defined by W.S. 35-2-901(a)(xvi) or an
assisted living facility as defined by W.S.
35-2-901(a)(xxii);
(B) Submits an application, the required
fee and a notarized attestation as part of the application
from an administrator or manager of the nursing care
facility or assisted living facility that the person is a
full-time resident of the facility;
(C) Furnishes all documentary evidence
necessary to verify any material change to information
listed on the original identification card.
(ii) No person shall be authorized to renew an
identification card under this subsection if the person has
renewed the card under this subsection two (2) times in the
last sixteen (16) years unless the person's most recent
photograph taken by the department of transportation is not
more than sixteen (16) years old on the date of renewal;
(iii) No person shall renew an identification
card under this subsection if the person is changing any of
the personal identifying information on the identification
card in accordance with W.S. 31-8-103(c).
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0080
ENROLLED ACT NO. 31, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. The Wyoming department of transportation
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.
(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3